Florida, session 2026, HB967.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 215.322,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
215.322 Acceptance of credit cards, charge cards, debit
cards, or electronic funds transfers by state agencies, units of
local government, and the judicial branch; acceptance of online
payments by units of local governments.—
(1)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage
state agencies, and the judicial branch, and require units of
local government to make their goods, services, and information
more convenient to the public through the acceptance of payments
by credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, or other means of
electronic funds transfers to the maximum extent practicable
when the benefits to the participating agency and the public
substantiate the cost of accepting these types of payments.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb967 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 967 2026 Legislature
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to require units
of local government to accept payments online.
(5)(a) Each A unit of local government, including a
municipality, special district, or board of county commissioners
or other governing body of a county, a consolidated or
metropolitan government, and any clerk of the circuit court,
sheriff, property appraiser, tax collector, or supervisor of
elections, shall is authorized to accept payment by use of
credit cards, charge cards, bank debit cards, and electronic
funds transfers for financial obligations that are owing to such
unit of local government, except when another form of payment is
required by law, and is authorized to surcharge the person who
uses a credit card, charge card, bank debit card, or electronic
funds transfer in payment of taxes, license fees, tuition,
fines, civil penalties, court-ordered payments, or court costs,
or other statutorily prescribed revenues an amount sufficient to
pay the service fee charges by the financial institution,
vending service company, or credit card company for such
services. Such A unit of local government shall verify both the
validity of any credit card, charge card, bank debit card, or
electronic funds transfer used pursuant to this subsection and
the existence of appropriate credit with respect to the person
using the card or transfer. The unit of local government does
not incur any liability as a result of such verification or any
subsequent action taken.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb967 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 967 2026 Legislature
(b) A unit of local government accepting payment under
paragraph (a) is required to have a method for accepting such
payment online.
Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb967 -01-er